Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2121.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 33(a) introductory paragraph of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 33. Temporary license.(a) General rule.--[A] Except as provided under subsection (d), a temporary license empowers the licensee to:* * *(d) Provisional licensure for international medical graduates.--123456789101112131415161718192021 (1) The board shall issue a provisional license to an international medical graduate who is not subject to subsection (a) and who provides all of the following to the board:(i) Evidence of the performance of duties as a physician for at least three years outside of the United States.(ii) A demonstration of English language proficiency.(iii) An Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates Certificate.(iv) Evidence of a passing score on the United States Medical Licensing Examination regarding:(A) Step 1, which tests foundational basic science concepts.(B) Step 2, which assesses clinical science knowledge for supervised patient care, including diagnosis and management.(v) Verification of foreign medical training or practice.(vi) Authorization to work in the United States for a specified period of time.(vii) Confirmation of a full-time job offer from a Commonwealth-licensed health care facility.(2) An international medical graduate who receives a provisional license in accordance with this subsection shall, as determined by the board, be subject to practicing under supervision, within designated underserved areas or within approved specialties.(3) A provisional license issued in accordance with this 20260HB2121PN2741 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection shall be valid for up to four years.(4) An international medical graduate who has maintained a provisional license in good standing for the entire provisional period, without any violation or pending investigation, shall be eligible to receive a full and unrestricted license to practice medicine in this Commonwealth. If the international medical graduate has complied with the supervised practice agreement and all relevant regulations, the board may not unreasonably withhold the approval of the full and unrestricted license.(5) No later than one year after the effective date of this paragraph, and annually thereafter, the board shall issue a report to the General Assembly that contains the following information regarding provisional licenses issued in accordance with this subsection:(i) The number of provisional licenses issued annually.(ii) The location in which each international medical graduate with a provisional license is currently practicing.(iii) The nature of the practice of each international medical graduate with a provisional license.(iv) Any other information that the board deems appropriate.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"International medical graduate." An individual who has graduated from an international medical school.20260HB2121PN2741 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Provisional license." A temporary license to practice medicine, which is issued to an international medical graduate in accordance with subsection (d).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2121PN2741 - 4 - 1234